Vermont, session 2025-2026, H607.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 27 V.S.A. § 547 is added to read:
§ 547. REAL ESTATE INVESTORS; 90-DAY WAITING PERIOD FOR
PURCHASE
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Covered entity” means an institutional real estate investor or an
entity that receives funding from an institutional real estate investor for the
purchase of a single-family residence or two-family residence. A loan
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 2 of 10
provided in exchange for a mortgage of the residence that is being purchased
shall not be considered funding for the purposes of this subdivision (1),
provided that such mortgage shall be of a type for which members of the
general public can apply.
(B) “Covered entity” does not include:
(i) an organization that is described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code and exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(ii) a land bank;
(iii) a community land trust; or
(iv) a creditor or its loan servicer acquiring ownership of real
property in full or partial satisfaction of a secured debt.
(2)(A) “Institutional real estate investor” means an entity or combined
group that, directly or indirectly:
(i) owns 10 or more single-family residences or two-family
residences, or both;
(ii) manages or receives funds pooled from investors and acts as a
fiduciary with respect to one or more investors; and
(iii) has $30,000,000.00 or more in net value or assets under
management on any day during the taxable year.
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 3 of 10
(B) An entity is considered owning a single-family residence or two-
family residence if it directly owns the single-family residence or two-family
residence or indirectly owns 10 percent or more of the single-family residence
or two-family residence.
(3) “Single-family residence” means a residential property consisting of
one dwelling unit, provided that the term does not include:
(A) any single-family residence that is to be used as the principal
residence of any person who has an ownership interest in the covered entity
that seeks to purchase the single-family residence; or
(B) any single-family residence constructed, acquired, or operated
with federal, state, or local appropriated funding sources.
(4) “Two-family residence” means a residential property consisting of
two dwelling units, provided that the term does not include:
(A) any two-family residence in which one of the dwelling units is to
be used as the principal residence of any person who has an ownership interest
in the covered entity that seeks to purchase the two-family residence; or
(B) any two-family residence constructed, acquired, or operated with
federal, state, or local appropriated funding sources.
(b) 90-day waiting period for covered entities.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a
covered entity shall not purchase, acquire, or offer to purchase or acquire any
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 4 of 10
interest in a single-family residence or two-family residence, unless the single-
family residence or two-family residence has been listed for sale to the general
public for at least 90 days.
(2) The 90-day waiting period set forth in subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall restart if the seller changes the asking price for the single-
family residence or two-family residence, and a covered entity shall not
purchase, acquire, or offer to purchase or acquire any interest in the single-
family residence or two-family residence until it has been listed for sale to the
general public at the new asking price for at least an additional 90 days.
(c) Enforcement. A violation of this section shall be deemed an unfair
method of competition in violation of 9 V.S.A. § 2453 and the Attorney
General may restrain prohibited acts in accordance with 9 V.S.A. chapter 63.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5811(18) is amended to read:
(18) “Vermont net income” means, for any taxable year and for any
corporate taxpayer:
(A) the taxable income of the taxpayer for that taxable year under the
laws of the United States, without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k), and excluding
income that under the laws of the United States is exempt from taxation by the
states:
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 5 of 10
(i) increased by:
(I) the amount of any deduction for State and local taxes on or
measured by income, franchise taxes measured by net income, franchise taxes
for the privilege of doing business and capital stock taxes;
(II) to the extent such income is exempted from taxation under
the laws of the United States by the amount received by the taxpayer on and
after January 1, 1986, as interest income from state and local obligations, other
than obligations of Vermont and its political subdivisions, and any dividends
or other distributions from any fund to the extent such dividend or distribution
is attributable to such Vermont State or local obligations; and
(III) the amount of any deduction for a federal net operating
loss; and
(IV) any amount required under section 5814 of this chapter
relating to federal depreciation and interest deductions taken by certain real
estate investors; and
* * *
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) is amended to read:
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
(A) increased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is excluded from federal adjusted gross income):
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 6 of 10
(i) interest income from non-Vermont state and local obligations;
and
(ii) dividends or other distributions from any fund to the extent
they are attributable to non-Vermont state or local obligations; and
(iii) any amount required under section 5814 of this chapter
relating to federal depreciation and interest deductions taken by certain real
estate investors; and
* * *
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5814 is added to read:
§ 5814. REAL ESTATE INVESTORS; DEPRECIATION AND INTEREST
DEDUCTIONS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Covered entity” means an institutional real estate investor or an
entity that receives funding from an institutional real estate investor for the
purchase of a single-family residence or two-family residence. A loan
provided in exchange for a mortgage of the residence that is being purchased
shall not be considered funding for the purposes of this subdivision (1),
provided that such mortgage shall be of a type for which members of the
general public can apply.
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 7 of 10
(B) “Covered entity” does not include:
(i) an organization that is described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code and exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(ii) a land bank;
(iii) a community land trust; or
(iv) a creditor or its loan servicer acquiring ownership of real
property in full or partial satisfaction of a secured debt.
(2)(A) “Institutional real estate investor” means an entity or combined
group that, directly or indirectly:
(i) owns 10 or more single-family residences or two-family
residences, or both;
(ii) manages or receives funds pooled from investors and acts as a
fiduciary with respect to one or more investors; and
(iii) has $30,000,000.00 or more in net value or assets under
management on any day during the taxable year.
(B) An entity is considered as owning a single-family residence or
two-family residence if it directly owns the single-family residence or two-
family residence or indirectly owns 10 percent or more of the single-family
residence or two-family residence.
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 8 of 10
(3) “Single-family residence” means a residential property consisting of
one dwelling unit, provided that the term does not include:
(A) any single-family residence that is to be used as the principal
residence of any person who has an ownership interest in the covered entity
that seeks to purchase the single-family residence; or
(B) any single-family residence constructed, acquired, or operated
with federal, state, or local appropriated funding sources.
(4) “Two-family residence” means a residential property consisting of
two dwelling units, provided that the term does not include:
(A) any two-family residence in which one of the dwelling units is to
be used as the principal residence of any person who has an ownership interest
in the covered entity that seeks to purchase the two-family residence; or
(B) any two-family residence constructed, acquired, or operated with
federal, state, or local appropriated funding sources.
(b) Depreciation and interest deduction for covered properties owned by an
institutional real estate investor.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
for a corporation, combined group, or any other taxpayer subject to taxation
under section 5832 of this chapter that is an institutional real estate investor or
a partner, member, or shareholder of an entity that is an institutional real estate
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 9 of 10
investor, Vermont net income shall be computed with adjustments for
depreciation and interest related to covered properties as follows:
(A) For covered properties, no deduction for depreciation allowed
under the Internal Revenue Code shall be allowed.
(B) For covered properties, the federal interest deduction allowed
under 26 U.S.C. § 163 shall not be allowed and must be added back in the
computation of Vermont net income, except with respect to interest paid or
accrued in the taxable year when the covered property is sold to an individual
for use as the principal residence of an individual or sold to a nonprofit
organization that has as its principal purpose the creation, development, or
preservation of affordable housing. For purposes of this subdivision (1)(B),
any amount of interest that would have been allowed under 26 U.S.C. § 163 in
connection with a covered property but for an election to treat such interest as
chargeable to a capital account shall be treated as an amount allowed under
26 U.S.C. § 163.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
for a taxpayer that is an institutional real estate investor or a partner, member,
or shareholder of an entity that is an institutional real estate investor, Vermont
taxable income shall be computed with adjustments for depreciation and
interest related to covered properties as follows:
VT LEG #386141 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.607
2026 Page 10 of 10
(A) For covered properties, no deduction for depreciation allowed
under the Internal Revenue Code shall be allowed.
(B) For covered properties, the federal interest deduction allowed
under 26 U.S.C. § 163 shall not be allowed and must be added back in the
computation of Vermont taxable income, except with respect to interest paid or
accrued in the taxable year when the covered property is sold to an individual
for use as the principal residence of an individual or sold to a nonprofit
organization that has as its principal purpose the creation, development, or
preservation of affordable housing. For purposes of this subdivision (2)(B),
any amount of interest that would have been allowed under 26 U.S.C. § 163 in
connection with a covered property but for an election to treat such interest as
chargeable to a capital account shall be treated as an amount allowed under
26 U.S.C. § 163.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section shall take effect on passage.
(b) Sec. 1 (90-day waiting period) shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
(c) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Secs. 2–4 (add back of deductions)
shall take effect retroactively on January 1, 2026, and shall apply to taxable
years beginning on and after January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386141 v.2